Louisiana, session 2026, HB627.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:23(B)(1) and (2)(b), (c), and (d) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§23. Audio and video recordings; live broadcast
* * *
B.(1)(a) Each nonelected board or commission that has the authority to levy
a tax shall video or audio record, film, or broadcast live all proceedings in a public
meeting.
(b) Each public entity created by law shall video record and broadcast live
all proceedings in a public meeting.
(2)
* * *
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph Subsection, "broadcast live" means the
publicly available distribution of audio and video of a meeting in real or near real
time via the internet or television broadcast.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1353 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 627
(c) The failure of a public body to broadcast live as required by this
Paragraph Subsection due to a technological failure beyond the control of the public
body or beyond its ability to resolve timely is not a violation of the provisions of this
Chapter.
(d) The requirement in this Paragraph Subsection for a public body to
broadcast its meetings does not apply to any executive session held in accordance
with this Chapter.
* * *